Maine, session 132, LD1523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for doula services
1. Definition. For purposes of this section, "doula services" means the provision of
services to a person by a nonclinical professional related to the physical, emotional and
informational support of that person throughout pregnancy, labor, birth and the postpartum
period, including, but not limited to, guidance and support concerning pregnancy health,
childbirth, infant feeding and newborn care.
2. Reimbursement. Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall provide
reimbursement under the MaineCare program for doula services, including, but not limited
to, attendance during childbirth and a maximum of 4 prenatal and 4 postpartum visits.
3. Advisory committee. The department shall establish a doula advisory committee
to provide advice and make recommendations to the department regarding doula services.
The advisory committee must include practicing doulas and must represent a range of
experience levels. Advice provided by the advisory committee must include, but is not
limited to, the scope of doula services eligible for reimbursement under this section, the
recruitment of a diverse workforce of doulas to provide services in the State, the
development of comprehensive continuing education and training at low cost,
reimbursement billing issues, outreach to the public about how to access doula services and
maintaining a reimbursement rate for doula services that incentivizes and supports a diverse
workforce.
4. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined by Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.